Ohio, session 136, SB271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5.63 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 5.63. The fourteenth day of October is designated as 6
"Charlie Kirk Memorial Day" in recognition of Charles James 7
Kirk, the political activist who was born on that day in 1993. 8